Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.170

Misrepresentation—Gross misdemeanor.

A person who attempts to obtain, obtains, or attempts to maintain a license by willful misrepresentation or fraudulent representation is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2002 c 86 s 118.]